src/fst/stems/verbs_newwords.lexc
!! This is where new words are added as lexc entries before they are 
!! added to the xml source files.
!! Mättʼtõshalltõs:Mättʼtõshalltõs PROP_SAJOS "(eng) /(fin) /(rus) " ;


LEXICON V_NEWWORDS
test:test N_MUORR "(eng) /(fin) /(rus) " ; !
!! ADD VERBS BELOW
laiʹddsted+V:laiʹddest V_OQNNSTED ;
kullsted+V:kullâst V_OQNNSTED "kuulua" ;
